Utah statutes.
78B-15-103.   Scope -- Choice of law.

(1)  This chapter applies to determinations of parentage in this state.

(2)  The tribunal shall apply the law of this state to adjudicate the parent-child relationship.  The applicable law may not depend upon:

(a)  the place of birth of the child; or

(b)  the past or present residence of the child.

(3)  This chapter may not create, enlarge, or diminish parental rights or duties under other laws of this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

